Massachusetts, session 194th, H1732.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 260 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section
5B, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following
section: -
§5B. Civil rights actions
Actions arising on account of violations of any law intended for the protection of civil
rights, including but not limited to actions alleging employment, housing and other
discrimination on the basis of race, color, creed, national origin, sex, age, ancestry or handicap
shall be commenced only within three years next after the cause of action accrues, except that an
action commenced under 42 U.S.C. §1681-1686,Title IX, for sexual assault, or sexual abuse, as
that term is defined in G.L. c. 260, section 4C, shall be governed by the provisions of G.L. c.
260, section 4C½.
of 2

SECTION 2. Chapter 277 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding at the end
of section 63, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, the following paragraph: -
Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an indictment or complaint alleging
an offense of indecent assault and battery, or an offense of rape, may be found and filed at any
time after the commission of such offense, provided that the victim was under the age of 18
when the offense was committed.
of 2